pt-PT: Campos de resposta incluídos: Aceitar/recusar; Recolha de endereço; Conselhos/votos de felicidades; Alergias; Presença de crianças; Restrições alimentares; Preferência de bebida; Escolha de refeição; Número de presentes; Acompanhante; Método de contacto para RSVP; Preferência/pedido de lugar; Vaivém/transporte; Pedido de música; Outro
ja: 回答フィールドには以下が含まれます: 出席/欠席; 住所の収集; アドバイス/お祝いの言葉; アレルギー; 子供の出席; 食事制限; 飲み物の希望; 食事の選択; 出席人数; 同伴者; 出欠の連絡方法; 座席の希望/リクエスト; 送迎/交通手段; 曲のリクエスト; その他
es: Campos de respuesta incluidos: Aceptar/rechazar; Recopilación de direcciones; Consejos/buenos deseos; Alergias; Asistencia de menores; Restricciones dietéticas; Preferencia de bebidas; Elección de comida; Número de asistentes; Acompañante; Método de contacto de confirmación de asistencia; Preferencia/solicitud de asiento; Servicio de traslado/transporte; Solicitud de canción; Otro
zh-TW: 包含的回應欄位: 接受/婉拒; 地址收集; 建議/祝福; 過敏; 攜帶兒童; 飲食限制; 飲品偏好; 餐點選擇; 出席人數; 攜伴; 回覆聯絡方式; 座位偏好/要求; 接駁/交通; 點歌; 其他
pl: Dołączono pola odpowiedzi: Akceptuj/Odrzuć; Zbieranie adresów; Porady/Życzenia; Alergie; Udział dzieci; Ograniczenia dietetyczne; Preferencje dotyczące napojów; Wybór posiłku; Liczba gości; Osoba towarzysząca; Metoda kontaktu RSVP; Preferencje dotyczące miejsc; Transport/Dojazd; Prośba o piosenkę; Inne
ro-RO: Câmpuri de răspuns incluse: Acceptare/Refuz; Colectare adresă; Sfaturi/Urări; Alergii; Copii participanți; Restricții alimentare; Preferințe pentru băuturi; Alegerea meniului; Număr de participanți; Însoțitor (+1); Metodă de contact RSVP; Preferință/Solicitare pentru locul la masă; Navetă/Transport; Solicitare melodie; Altele
zh-CN: 回复卡选项字段: 接受/拒绝; 地址收集; 建议/祝福; 过敏史; 儿童出席; 饮食限制; 饮品偏好; 餐食选择; 出席人数; 携伴; 确认出席联系方式; 座位偏好/要求; 班车/交通; 歌曲要求; 其他
hr-HR: Uključena polja za odgovor: Prihvaćanje/odbijanje; Prikupljanje adresa; Savjeti / dobre želje; Alergije; Dolazak djece; Ograničenja u prehrani; Odabir pića; Odabir obroka; Broj prisutnih; Pratnja; Način kontaktiranja za odgovor (RSVP); Odabir/zahtjev za sjedenje; Prijevoz; Zahtjev za pjesmu; Ostalo
fi: Mukaan sisältyvät vastauskentät: Hyväksy/hylkää; Osoitteiden keruu; Neuvoja/onnentoivotuksia; Allergiat; Osallistuvat lapset; Ruokavaliorajoitukset; Juomatoive; Ateriavalinta; Osallistujien määrä; Avec; RSVP-yhteystapa; Istumapaikkatoive/pyyntö; Kuljetus; Kappaletoive; Muu
it: Campi di risposta inclusi: Accetta/Rifiuta; Raccolta indirizzi; Consigli/Auguri; Allergie; Partecipazione bambini; Restrizioni alimentari; Preferenza bevande; Scelta pasto; Numero partecipanti; Accompagnatore; Metodo di contatto RSVP; Preferenza/richiesta posto a sedere; Navetta/trasporto; Richiesta brano musicale; Altro
en: Response fields included: Accept/decline; Address collection; Advice/well wishes; Allergies; Children attending; Dietary restrictions; Drink preference; Meal choice; Number attending; Plus-one; RSVP contact method; Seating preference/request; Shuttle/transportation; Song request; Other
th: ช่องสำหรับตอบกลับประกอบด้วย: ยอมรับ/ปฏิเสธ; การเก็บรวบรวมที่อยู่; คำแนะนำ/คำอวยพร; อาการแพ้; มีเด็กเข้าร่วม; ข้อจำกัดด้านอาหาร; เครื่องดื่มที่ชอบ; ตัวเลือกมื้ออาหาร; จำนวนผู้เข้าร่วม; ผู้ติดตาม 1 คน; วิธีการติดต่อตอบรับคำเชิญ; ความชอบ/คำขอที่นั่ง; รถรับส่ง/การเดินทาง; ขอเพลง; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Zahrnuté polia na odpoveď: Prijať/Odmietnuť; Zhromažďovanie adries; Rady/Priania; Alergie; Prítomnosť detí; Dietetické obmedzenia; Preferovaný nápoj; Výber jedla; Počet zúčastnených; Sprievod; Spôsob kontaktu pre RSVP; Preferované miesta na sedenie/požiadavky; Kyvadlová doprava/preprava; Žiadosť o pieseň; Iné
sv: Svarsfält ingår: Acceptera/avböj; Adressinsamling; Råd/lyckönskningar; Allergier; Barn deltar; Specialkost; Dryckespreferens; Måltidsval; Antal deltagare; Plus en; Kontaktmetod för OSA; Önskemål om sittplats; Transport/buss; Önskelåt; Annat
da: Svarfelter inkluderet: Accepter/afvis; Indsamling af adresse; Gode råd/hilsner; Allergier; Deltagende børn; Kosthensyn; Foretrukne drikkevarer; Valg af måltid; Antal deltagende; Ledsager; Kontaktmetode for s.u.; Foretrukken siddeplads/anmodning; Shuttle/transport; Ønske til sang; Andet
ko: 포함된 응답 필드: 수락/거절; 주소 수집; 조언/덕담; 알레르기; 아동 동반 여부; 식이 제한; 음료 선호도; 식사 선택; 참석 인원수; 동반 1인; RSVP 연락 방법; 좌석 선호도/요청; 셔틀/교통편; 노래 요청; 기타
bg-BG: С включени полета за отговор: Приемане/отказване; Събиране на адреси; Съвети/пожелания; Алергии; Присъстващи деца; Диетични ограничения; Предпочитания за напитки; Избор на храна; Брой присъстващи; Плюс един; Начин за връзка за RSVP; Предпочитание/заявка за място; Трансфер/транспорт; Заявка за песен; Други
el: Περιλαμβανόμενα πεδία απόκρισης: Αποδοχή/απόρριψη; Συλλογή διευθύνσεων; Συμβουλές/ευχές; Αλλεργίες; Συμμετοχή παιδιών; Διατροφικοί περιορισμοί; Προτίμηση ποτού; Επιλογή γεύματος; Αριθμός παρευρισκομένων; Συνοδός (plus-one); Μέθοδος επικοινωνίας RSVP; Προτίμηση/αίτημα θέσης; Μεταφορά/μετακίνηση; Αίτημα τραγουδιού; Άλλο
cs: Pole pro odpověď, která jsou součástí: Přijmout/odmítnout; Shromažďování adres; Rady/přání; Alergie; Účast dětí; Dietní omezení; Preference nápojů; Výběr jídla; Počet zúčastněných; Doprovod; Kontaktní metoda pro RSVP; Preference/žádost ohledně míst k sezení; Kyvadlová doprava / doprava; Písničky na přání; Jiné
nl: Antwoordvelden inbegrepen: Accepteren/weigeren; Verzamelen van adressen; Advies/gelukwensen; Allergieën; Aanwezige kinderen; Dieetwensen; Drankvoorkeur; Maaltijdkeuze; Aantal aanwezigen; Plus één; RSVP-contactmethode; Zitplaatsvoorkeur/-verzoek; Pendeldienst/vervoer; Verzoeknummer; Overig
fr: Champs de réponse inclus: Accepter/décliner; Collecte d’adresse; Conseils/vœux; Allergies; Enfants présents; Restrictions alimentaires; Préférence de boisson; Choix de repas; Nombre de participants; Accompagnateur; Méthode de contact RSVP; Préférence/demande de placement; Navette/transport; Demande de chanson; Autre
ru: Входящие в комплект поля ответа: Принять/отклонить; Сбор адресов; Советы/пожелания; Аллергия; Присутствие детей; Диетические ограничения; Предпочтения в напитках; Выбор блюд; Количество присутствующих; Плюс один; Способ связи для подтверждения присутствия; Предпочтения/пожелания по рассадке; Трансфер/транспорт; Заказ песни; Другое
vi: Các trường phản hồi bao gồm: Chấp nhận/từ chối; Thu thập địa chỉ; Lời khuyên/lời chúc tốt đẹp; Dị ứng; Trẻ em tham gia; Yêu cầu về chế độ ăn uống; Tùy chọn thức uống; Lựa chọn bữa ăn; Số lượng tham gia; Khách đi kèm; Phương thức liên hệ RSVP; Tùy chọn/yêu cầu về chỗ ngồi; Xe đưa đón/phương tiện di chuyển; Yêu cầu bài hát; Khác
nb: Svarfelt inkludert: Godta/avslå; Adresseinnsamling; Råd / gode ønsker; Allergier; Barn som deltar; Kostholdsrestriksjoner; Drikkepreferanse; Måltidsvalg; Antall deltakere; Ledsager; Kontaktmetode for svar; Forespørsel om/preferanse for sitteplass; Skyttelbuss/transport; Forespørsel om sang; Annet
de: Enthaltene Antwortfelder: Zusagen/Absagen; Adressenerfassung; Ratschläge/Glückwünsche; Allergien; Teilnehmende Kinder; Ernährungseinschränkungen; Getränkepräferenz; Menüauswahl; Anzahl der Teilnehmenden; Begleitperson; RSVP-Kontaktmethode; Sitzplatzpräferenz/-wunsch; Shuttle/Transport; Liedwunsch; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Įtraukti atsakymo laukai: Priimti / atmesti; Adreso rinkimas; Patarimai / linkėjimai; Alergijos; Dalyvaujantys vaikai; Mitybos apribojimai; Gėrimų pageidavimai; Patiekalo pasirinkimas; Dalyvaujančiųjų skaičius; Plius vienas; RSVP susisiekimo būdas; Sėdėjimo vietos pageidavimas; Pervežimas / transportas; Dainos pageidavimas; Kita
pt-BR: Campos de resposta incluídos: Aceitar/recusar; Coleta de endereço; Conselhos/votos de felicidades; Alergias; Presença de crianças; Restrições alimentares; Preferência de bebida; Opção de refeição; Número de participantes; Acompanhante; Forma de contato para RSVP; Preferência/solicitação de assento; Translado/transporte; Solicitação de música; Outro
hu: Válaszkártyán szereplő mezők: Elfogadás/elutasítás; Címgyűjtés; Tanács/jókívánságok; Allergiák; Részt vevő gyermekek; Étrendi korlátozások; Italválasztás; Menüválasztás; Résztvevők száma; Kísérő (+1 fő); Visszajelzés (RSVP) módja; Ültetési preferencia/kérés; Transzfer/szállítás; Zenei kívánság; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vključena polja za odgovor: Sprejmi/zavrni; Zbiranje naslovov; Nasvet/lepe želje; Alergije; Udeležba otrok; Prehranske omejitve; Želena pijača; Izbira obroka; Število udeležencev; Spremljevalec (+1); Način stika za potrditev udeležbe; Želja/zahteva glede sedeža; Prevoz/kombi; Želja glede pesmi; Drugo
tr: Dahil olan yanıt alanları: Kabul et/reddet; Adres alma; Tavsiye/iyi dilekler; Alerjiler; Katılan çocuklar; Beslenme kısıtlamaları; İçecek tercihi; Yemek seçimi; Katılımcı sayısı; Artı bir (+1); LCV iletişim yöntemi; Oturma düzeni tercihi/talebi; Servis/ulaşım; Şarkı isteği; Diğer